src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs !!= @CODE@
hlgihl CLASS-IHL-STEM-1 "for S to spin or twist O together (with X1) (into X2)" ;
k'ihl CLASS-IHL-STEM-1 "for S (sg) to go out, die, run dry, dry up, evaporate" ;
kwah% k'ihl CLASS-IHL-STEM-1 "for S (sg) to stop running, to stop flowing, to run dry [said of a stream]" ;
ta% hlgihl CLASS-IHL-STEM-1 "for S to make rope, make line" ;
tla% k'ihl CLASS-IHL-STEM-1 "for S to drain C (sg), to put C (sg) out, to extinguish C (sg) [said of a pond, a light, etc.]" ;
xál% k'ihl CLASS-IHL-STEM-1 "for S (sg) to go out having burned up all its fuel, to burn itself out [said of a fire], to boil dry, to evaporate from the heat [said of liquid]" ;
xudä% k'ihl CLASS-IHL-STEM-1 "for S to bail C (sg) dry [said of bilge only]" ;
